Utah statutes.
76-5-307.   Definitions.

As used in Sections 76-5-308 through 76-5-312 of this part:

(1)  "Family member" means a person's parent, grandparent, sibling, or any other person related to the person by consanguinity or affinity to the second degree.

(2)  "Smuggling of human beings" means the transportation or procurement of transportation for one or more persons by an actor who knows or has reason to know that the person or persons transported or to be transported are not:

(a)  citizens of the United States;

(b)  permanent resident aliens; or

(c)  otherwise lawfully in this state or entitled to be in this state.



Enacted by Chapter 343, 2008 General Session

